New Jersey, session 222, S1408.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   The Division of Consumer Affairs shall develop obtain, arrange for, or contract with a vendor to provide an automated system for use by the boards, committees, or other entities in the division that regulate a profession or occupation which requires a licensee to complete continuing education to renew a license to track the continuing education credits or hours completed by each licensee to assist in determining licensee compliance with any such requirement. 2.   This act shall take effect on the first day of the 19th month next following the date of enactment and shall apply to application for renewal of a license received on or after the effective date.  The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs may also take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.